Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1106
Sections, how construed.

Sections 70-650.01 and 70-1101 to 70-1106 shall be deemed to be complete within themselves, to cover the entire subject to which it relates and to be an independent act.

Laws 1963, c. 398, § 7, p. 1272.